Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 3 Adjutant General and Other Executives

38-2-150.
Adjutant general — Eligibility; appointment; compensation; bond.

There shall be an adjutant general of the state who shall be appointed by the Governor for a term concurrent with the term of the Governor appointing such person and who shall serve as such at the pleasure of the Governor. The adjutant general shall have not less than the rank of a major general, the specific rank to be determined by the Governor. The adjutant general shall not be less than 30 nor more than 65 years of age. No person shall be eligible to hold the office of adjutant general unless he or she holds or has held a commission of at least the rank of field grade or the equivalent in the organized militia of the state, in the armed forces of the United States, or in a reserve component thereof and shall have served not less than five years in one or more of such services at the time of his or her appointment. The adjutant general shall receive the pay and allowances for his or her rank as provided by law for an officer of equivalent rank in the regular armed forces of the United States. The Governor shall require the adjutant general to give bond to the state, conditioned on the faithful discharge of the duties of the office, in the sum of $10,000.00 with good and sufficient security, to be approved by the Governor. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the adjutant general shall not be subject to the provisions of subsection (e) of Code Section 38-2-279, relating to pay for 18 days’ absence and emergency pay.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-501; Ga. L. 1935, p. 95, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 9; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 23; Ga. L. 1963, p. 10, § 2; Ga. L. 1967, p. 11, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 299, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 902; Ga. L. 2001, p. 26, § 1.

38-2-151.
Adjutant general — Duties; records; seal; effect of seal on documentary evidence.

The adjutant general shall be chief of staff to the Governor and subordinate only to the Governor in matters pertaining to the Department of Defense and the military and naval affairs of the state.

Whenever the Governor and those who would act in succession to him under the Constitution and laws of the state are unable to perform the duties of commander in chief, the adjutant general shall command the militia.

It shall be the duty of the adjutant general:

To direct the planning and employment of the forces of the organized militia in carrying out their state military mission;

To establish unified command of state forces whenever they are jointly engaged; and

To coordinate the military and naval affairs with the emergency management agency of the state.

The adjutant general shall:

Be custodian of all military records and shall keep the same indexed and available for ready reference;

Keep an itemized account of all moneys received and disbursed from all sources;

Make an annual report to the Governor on the condition of the organized militia with a roster of all commissioned officers and such other matters relating to the Military Division, Department of Defense as he shall deem expedient; and

Cause the laws and regulations relating to the militia to be indexed, printed, bound, and distributed to all forces of the organized militia.

The adjutant general shall further perform such duties pertaining to his office as from time to time may be provided by the laws, rules, and regulations of the United States and such as may be designated by the Governor.

The adjutant general shall have a seal of office approved by the Governor, and all copies and papers in the Military Division, Department of Defense which are duly certified and authenticated under the seal shall be evidence in like manner as if the original were produced.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-501; Ga. L. 1935, p. 95, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 9; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 24.

Cross references.

Authority of adjutant general to empower service contract security guards employed by Department of Defense to arrest summarily persons violating laws at or near facilities of Georgia Air National Guard and Georgia Army National Guard, §

50-16-15

.

38-2-152.
Assistant adjutants general; eligibility; appointment; duties; compensation; tenure.

The Governor shall appoint an assistant adjutant general for army and an assistant adjutant general for air to assist the adjutant general in the discharge and performance of his or her duties. Each of the assistant adjutants general, at the time of appointment, shall be a federally recognized officer with the rank of lieutenant colonel or higher. An officer who has retired or resigned from the Georgia National Guard or any other component of the Army or Air Force shall be eligible for appointment as assistant adjutant general for army or air; provided, however, that the officer shall have served in a federally recognized status in the active Army or Air National Guard or any other component of the Army or Air Force, as appropriate, and attained the rank of lieutenant colonel or higher; and provided, further, that the appointment of the officer shall be within five years after the date of his or her retirement or resignation and prior to his or her attaining age 60. Each of the assistant adjutants general shall have the rank of not less than brigadier general, the specific rank to be determined by the Governor. Each of the officers shall receive the pay and allowances for his or her rank as provided by law for an officer of equivalent rank in the regular armed forces of the United States. In the event of a vacancy in the office of the adjutant general, and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified as provided by law, the assistant adjutant general who is senior in rank shall perform the duties required of the adjutant general in connection with the military division, as provided by law. Assistant adjutants general shall hold no other state office, and they shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The adjutant general may appoint, designate, or detail officers of the National Guard as deputy assistant adjutants general for army and for air who shall perform the military duties assigned by the adjutant general. Deputy assistant adjutants general shall be of field grade or general officer rank, the specific rank to be determined by the adjutant general. Deputy assistant adjutants general shall serve at the pleasure of the adjutant general.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-501; Ga. L. 1935, p. 95, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 9; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 25; Ga. L. 1963, p. 10, § 3; Ga. L. 1970, p. 299, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 84, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1258, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 26, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 105, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 52, § 1/HB 800.

38-2-153.
State property and fiscal officer; appointment; duties; reports; bonds; compensation.

The adjutant general may appoint, designate, or detail, subject to the approval of the Governor, a person as the state property and fiscal officer, who shall, under the authority of the adjutant general, have charge of, issue, and be accountable for all state military property and shall make such property returns and reports of the same as the adjutant general may direct. He or she shall be under bond to the state for such amount as the Governor may deem necessary. The adjutant general shall fix the compensation of the state property and fiscal officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-502; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 9; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 26; Ga. L. 1996, p. 740, § 1.